sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 sifumokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumomu/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumondi/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumori/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumoru/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumoti/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumotu/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumou/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumova/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumowa/H . 
PFX A 0 sifumozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigaro/C . 
PFX A 0 sigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 sigaro/F . 
PFX A 0 sigaroa/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarochi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarohu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigaroi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigaroka/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigaromu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarondi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarori/H . 
PFX A 0 sigaroru/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigaroti/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarotu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarou/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarova/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarowa/H . 
PFX A 0 sigarozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigo/C . 
PFX A 0 sigo/D . 
PFX A 0 sigo/F . 
PFX A 0 sigoa/H . 
PFX A 0 sigochi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigohu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigoi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigoka/H . 
PFX A 0 sigokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigomu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigondi/H . 
PFX A 0 sigori/H . 
PFX A 0 sigoru/H . 
PFX A 0 sigorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigoti/H . 
PFX A 0 sigotu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sigou/H . 
PFX A 0 sigova/H . 
PFX A 0 sigowa/H . 
PFX A 0 sigozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 sihu/C . 
PFX A 0 sihu/D . 
PFX A 0 sihu/F . 
PFX A 0 sihwu/C . 
PFX A 0 sihwu/D . 
PFX A 0 sihwu/F . 
PFX A 0 sii/C . 
PFX A 0 sii/D . 
PFX A 0 sii/F . 
PFX A 0 siisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 siisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 siisvo/F . 
PFX A 0 siisvoa/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvochi/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvohu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvoi/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvoka/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvomu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvondi/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvori/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvoru/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvoti/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvotu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvou/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvova/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvowa/H . 
PFX A 0 siisvozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 sika/C . 
PFX A 0 sika/D . 
PFX A 0 sika/F . 
PFX A 0 siku/C . 
PFX A 0 siku/D . 
PFX A 0 siku/F . 
PFX A 0 simbo/C . 
PFX A 0 simbo/D . 
PFX A 0 simbo/F . 
PFX A 0 simboa/H . 
PFX A 0 simbochi/H . 
PFX A 0 simbodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 simbohu/H . 
PFX A 0 simbohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 simboi/H . 
PFX A 0 simboka/H . 
PFX A 0 simbokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 simbomu/H . 
PFX A 0 simbondi/H . 
PFX A 0 simbori/H . 
PFX A 0 simboru/H . 
PFX A 0 simborwu/H . 
PFX A 0 simboti/H . 
PFX A 0 simbotu/H . 
PFX A 0 simbotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 simbou/H . 
PFX A 0 simbova/H . 
PFX A 0 simbowa/H . 
PFX A 0 simbozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 simu/C . 
PFX A 0 simu/D . 
PFX A 0 simu/F . 
PFX A 0 sindi/C . 
PFX A 0 sindi/D . 
PFX A 0 sindi/F . 
PFX A 0 sindo/C . 
PFX A 0 sindo/D . 
PFX A 0 sindo/F . 
PFX A 0 sindoa/H . 
PFX A 0 sindochi/H . 
PFX A 0 sindodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 sindohu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindoi/H . 
PFX A 0 sindoka/H . 
PFX A 0 sindokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindomu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindondi/H . 
PFX A 0 sindori/H . 
PFX A 0 sindoru/H . 
PFX A 0 sindorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindoti/H . 
PFX A 0 sindotu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 sindou/H . 
PFX A 0 sindova/H . 
PFX A 0 sindowa/H . 
PFX A 0 sindozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 singa/C . 
PFX A 0 singaa/H . 
PFX A 0 singachi/H . 
PFX A 0 singado/C . 
PFX A 0 singadofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singadofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singadogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singadono/C . 
PFX A 0 singadonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singadosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singadosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singadosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singadoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singadoto/C . 
PFX A 0 singadowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singadozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singadzi/H . 
PFX A 0 singafano/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanono/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanoto/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singafanozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumono/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumoto/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singafumozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaroisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaronguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarono/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaronyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaronyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaroswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singagaroto/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singagarozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singago/C . 
PFX A 0 singagodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singagofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singagoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singagono/C . 
PFX A 0 singagonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singagosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singagosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singagosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singagoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singagoto/C . 
PFX A 0 singagowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singagozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singagozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singahu/H . 
PFX A 0 singahwu/H . 
PFX A 0 singai/H . 
PFX A 0 singaisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvono/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvoto/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singaisvozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singaka/H . 
PFX A 0 singaku/H . 
PFX A 0 singakwu/H . 
PFX A 0 singambo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singambofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singambogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singamboisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singambono/C . 
PFX A 0 singambonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singambosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singambosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singambosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singamboswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singamboto/C . 
PFX A 0 singambowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singambozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singambozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singamu/H . 
PFX A 0 singandi/H . 
PFX A 0 singando/C . 
PFX A 0 singandodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singandofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singandogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandongo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singandono/C . 
PFX A 0 singandonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 singandosi/C . 
PFX A 0 singandosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 singandosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 singandoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 singandoto/C . 
PFX A 0 singandowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 singandozai/C . 
PFX A 0 singandozo/C . 
PFX A 0 singango/C . 
PFX A 0 singangodo/C . 
PFX A 0 singangofano/C . 
PFX A 0 singangofumo/C . 
PFX A 0 singangogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 singangogo/C . 
PFX A 0 singangoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 singangombo/C . 
PFX A 0 singangondo/C . 
PFX A 0 singangonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 singangono/C . 
