sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
ashidza/AVQ
bandira/AVQ
batanura/AVQ
bebura/AVQ
betserwa/AVQ
bhajeta/AVQ
bhedhenurira/AVQ
bhimhidza/AVQ
bhovozera/AVQ
bhuroka/AVQ
bikira/AVQ
bira/AVQ
bododza/AVQ
bongodza/AVQ
bowa/AVQ
bufura/AVQ
bungatira/AVQ
busa/AVQ
bvanyudza/AVQ
bvibvita/AVQ
bvododza/AVQ
bvotomokesa/AVQ
bvukura/AVQ
bvundisa/AVQ
bvurudzira/AVQ
bwagura/AVQ
bwebwedza/AVQ
bwimbura/AVQ
chabvuka/AVQ
chachura/AVQ
chama/AVQ
charira/AVQ
chechenyuka/AVQ
chekeredza/AVQ
chengedza/AVQ
chenyn'era/AVQ
cheura/AVQ
chinduka/AVQ
chirikisa/AVQ
chogodora/AVQ
chubwira/AVQ
dadadzika/AVQ
dakuka/AVQ
danzurira/AVQ
dedenya/AVQ
demwaira/AVQ
depuka/AVQ
dhadhaira/AVQ
dhanza/AVQ
dhidhidza/AVQ
dhirimisa/AVQ
dhonora/AVQ
dhunga/AVQ
dikanwa/AVQ
dinha/AVQ
dohwaira/AVQ
donyongodza/AVQ
duka/AVQ
dungamidzana/AVQ
dwaisa/AVQ
dzadza/AVQ
dzamura/AVQ
dzemura/AVQ
dzika/AVQ
dzimbira/AVQ
dzipuka/AVQ
dziyirirana/AVQ
dzongodza/AVQ
dzumburudza/AVQ
dzuvaira/AVQ
dzvinyisa/AVQ
dzvutumadza/AVQ
embera/AVQ
enzanisa/AVQ
fachukisa/AVQ
fambisa/AVQ
farandandira/AVQ
fashukira/AVQ
fefeterwa/AVQ
fena/AVQ
fereredza/AVQ
fidigara/AVQ
finyura/AVQ
fojera/AVQ
fonyedza/AVQ
fototodza/AVQ
fudzisa/AVQ
fugudura/AVQ
fukunuka/AVQ
fumisa/AVQ
fundura/AVQ
funya/AVQ
furaya/AVQ
furuvara/AVQ
futwa/AVQ
gachaura/AVQ
gadzva/AVQ
gamuchira/AVQ
ganyakanya/AVQ
gaura/AVQ
gidhima/AVQ
godoka/AVQ
gomberwa/AVQ
gononda/AVQ
gozhera/AVQ
guhumura/AVQ
gumbidzira/AVQ
gumisira/AVQ
gurikanya/AVQ
gutisa/AVQ
gwachatika/AVQ
gwanda/AVQ
gwebedudza/AVQ
gwejenyura/AVQ
gwinhana/AVQ
hata/AVQ
hohora/AVQ
huta/AVQ
hwazhura/AVQ
hwira/AVQ
ingira/AVQ
iwara/AVQ
jamuka/AVQ
jekesa/AVQ
jogoda/AVQ
junga/AVQ
kahamadza/AVQ
kakarisa/AVQ
kamba/AVQ
kandira/AVQ
kangavira/AVQ
kanyura/AVQ
karara/AVQ
kasikira/AVQ
katyamara/AVQ
kekereza/AVQ
kinura/AVQ
kochekedza/AVQ
kohomara/AVQ
kokorora/AVQ
kombwera/AVQ
kongonyarisa/AVQ
kopera/AVQ
kororedza/AVQ
kota/AVQ
kovora/AVQ
kudubuka/AVQ
kukuzva/AVQ
kumucha/AVQ
kunguruka/AVQ
kura/AVQ
kuruta/AVQ
kutura/AVQ
kuzvuka/AVQ
kwadzera/AVQ
kwangura/AVQ
kwarabvura/AVQ
kwatsamura/AVQ
kwegura/AVQ
kwenyaidza/AVQ
kwevedzera/AVQ
kwikwidza/AVQ
maira/AVQ
manija/AVQ
marangura/AVQ
mbeya/AVQ
mbundikira/AVQ
medura/AVQ
meresa/AVQ
mheya/AVQ
mininika/AVQ
momera/AVQ
monyonga/AVQ
munya/AVQ
mveyesana/AVQ
mwaradzira/AVQ
mweka/AVQ
mwiza/AVQ
nama/AVQ
nanauka/AVQ
n'anyura/AVQ
nava-nava/AVQ
ndengendeka/AVQ
ndinyira/AVQ
ndurika/AVQ
n'en'a/AVQ
nengura/AVQ
nganyaira/AVQ
ngereredza/AVQ
ngotyoka/AVQ
ngura/AVQ
ngwanjaira/AVQ
ngwindimara/AVQ
nhinganika/AVQ
nhunhuvara/AVQ
ninipa/AVQ
njanganja/AVQ
njenjemara/AVQ
nobvora/AVQ
nonokera/AVQ
n'urun'uta/AVQ
nyadura/AVQ
nyambwaira/AVQ
nyangaridza/AVQ
nyapudza/AVQ
nyavaidza/AVQ
nyenama/AVQ
nyeredza/AVQ
nyevenuka/AVQ
nyinyiridza/AVQ
nyomba/AVQ
nyowedza/AVQ
nyungurwi/AVQ
nzonza/AVQ
nzvengana/AVQ
nzwisa/AVQ
ombeka/AVQ
onererwa/AVQ
padudza/AVQ
pamba/AVQ
pandanisa/AVQ
papurika/AVQ
pata/AVQ
pedudza/AVQ
penyu/AVQ
peta/AVQ
pfarima/AVQ
pfigisa/AVQ
pfondora/AVQ
pfuma/AVQ
pfungata/AVQ
pfurunyura/AVQ
pikira/AVQ
pingudza/AVQ
piripisha/AVQ
poma/AVQ
posheka/AVQ
pukuta/AVQ
pupira/AVQ
putirira/AVQ
pwesa/AVQ
ragadura/AVQ
rangamuka/AVQ
ratidzira/AVQ
rehwa/AVQ
rerekera/AVQ
ridzisa/AVQ
ripisa/AVQ
rongeka/AVQ
royanura/AVQ
runda/AVQ
rwisana/AVQ
samara/AVQ
sasamuka/AVQ
sendeka/AVQ
sevenza/AVQ
shandika/AVQ
shatisisa/AVQ
shinaira/AVQ
shoma/AVQ
shovonora/AVQ
shuwa/AVQ
simbisana/AVQ
siyirira/AVQ
sota/AVQ
sungata/AVQ
susa/AVQ
svaurutsa/AVQ
svimha/AVQ
svomhora/AVQ
svusvudza/AVQ
tadaguka/AVQ
tamba/AVQ
tandashira/AVQ
tapatidza/AVQ
tarisisa/AVQ
tava/AVQ
tekenyeka/AVQ
tenderedza/AVQ
tepfama/AVQ
teteredza/AVQ
tigidza/AVQ
tiningika/AVQ
todza/AVQ
topora/AVQ
tsamura/AVQ
tsaurira/AVQ
tsetsenura/AVQ
tsinatidza/AVQ
tsiura/AVQ
tsotsora/AVQ
tsurundundika/AVQ
tsvedemuka/AVQ
tsvikudza/AVQ
tswakatika/AVQ
tukunya/AVQ
tunhaidza/AVQ
tutira/AVQ
twinzura/AVQ
ukuta/AVQ
unguza/AVQ
vafaira/AVQ
vara/AVQ
venzengera/AVQ
vharavhanyuka/AVQ
vhikisa/AVQ
vhota/AVQ
vhunira/AVQ
vindinuka/AVQ
wacha/AVQ
waruka/AVQ
wombera/AVQ
yambusa/AVQ
yenzanisa/AVQ
zaridza/AVQ
zeza/AVQ
zhurukuzha/AVQ
zorera/AVQ
zvambararisa/AVQ
zvinya/AVQ
